Hawaii statutes.
§440-5 Deputy commissioners. The
director may appoint deputy commissioners; provided that the director has the
approval of the commission prior to any appointment. The director may remove
deputy commissioners after consultation with the commission. The commission
may direct the deputy commissioner or deputy commissioners to be present at any
boxing contest and, in the absence of the commission or a member thereof, to
superintend and control the boxing contest, in accordance with this chapter and
the rules adopted by the commission pursuant thereto. The deputy commissioners
shall make a written report to the executive officer in the manner and form
prescribed by the commission of the conditions prevailing at every contest. [L
1949, c 264, §2; am L 1953, c 165, §1; RL 1955, §165-5; am imp L 1963, c 21, §1
and c 114, §3; HRS §440-5; am L 1983, c 241, §3; am L 2004, c 135, §4]

Cross References

Director of commerce and consumer affairs, see §26-9.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next